Hawaii statutes.
PART V.
CHICKEN EGGS

§147-71 Words and phrases defined.
Whenever used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Addled" or "white rot"
means an egg which is putrid or rotten.

"Adherent yolk" means an egg in which
the yolk has settled to one side and become fastened to the shell.

"Black rot" means an egg which has
deteriorated to such an extent that the whole interior presents a blackened
appearance before the candle.

"Blood ring" means an egg which
contains blood.

"Consumer" means any person
purchasing eggs for the person's own family use or consumption, or a
restaurant, hotel, boarding house, bakery, or other institution purchasing eggs
for serving to guests or patrons, or for its or their use in cooking or baking.

"Eggs" means chicken eggs in the
following forms:

(1) Uncooked in the shell; and

(2) Liquid, frozen, or dried whole egg meats, whites
of eggs or egg yolks.

"Moldy" means an egg in which mold
has developed inside the shell.

"Retailer" means any person, firm,
corporation, or association which sells eggs to a consumer. [L 1931, c 70, §2;
RL 1935, §1074; RL 1945, §1305; RL 1955, §22-70; am L 1959, c 5, §1(b); HRS
§147-71; am L 1985, c 18, §1; gen ch 1985]

Revision Note

Definitions
rearranged.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next